Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1074
Hearings; affidavits.

On the hearing of an application for an injunction, each party may read affidavits. All affidavits shall be filed.

R.S.1867, Code § 262, p. 437;

R.S.1913, § 7803;

C.S.1922, § 8747;

C.S.1929, § 20-1074;

R.S.1943, § 25-1074.

This section permits affidavits on application for injunction, but not on final hearing. Francisco v. Furry, 82 Neb. 754, 118 N.W. 1102 (1908).